Utah statutes.
19-2-124.   Application for certification of pollution control facility --
Refunds -- Interest.
(1) (a)  A person who qualifies under Subsection (2) may apply to the board
for certification of a pollution control facility erected, constructed, or
installed, or to be erected, constructed, or installed in the state.
(b)  The person may file the application after:
(i)  a firm construction contract has been entered; or
(ii)  construction has commenced.
(2) (a) (i)  A person who applies under Subsection (1) shall be:
(A)  the owner of a trade or business that uses property in the state
requiring a pollution control facility to prevent or minimize pollution; or
(B)  a person who, as a lessee or pursuant to an agreement, conducts the trade
or business that operates or uses the property.
(ii)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), "owner" includes a contract
purchaser.
(b)  The facility shall be owned, operated, or leased during a part of the tax
year in which the exemption is claimed.
(c)  A person who obtains certification for a pollution control facility may
claim an exemption from sales and use taxes as provided in Sections 19-2-123
and 59-12-104.
(d)  A person who pays a tax under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax
Act, on a purchase of tangible personal property or services used in the
construction of or incorporated into a pollution control facility that:
(i)  is not certified under Section 19-2-125, may obtain a refund of the tax
if:
(A)  the board subsequently certifies the pollution control facility;
(B)  the tangible personal property or services meet the requirements for
exemption provided in Subsections 19-2-123(2) and 59-12-104(11), except for
the certification requirement; and
(C)  the person files a claim for the refund with the State Tax Commission
within the lesser of:
(I)  three years after the day on which the pollution control facility is
certified under Section 19-2-125; or
(II)  six years after the day on which the person pays the tax under Title 59,
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act; or
(ii)  is certified under Section 19-2-125, may obtain a refund of the tax if:
(A)  the tangible personal property or services meet the requirements for
exemption provided in Subsections 19-2-123(2) and 59-12-104(11); and
(B)  the person files a claim for the refund with the State Tax Commission
within three years after the day on which the person pays the tax under Title
59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.
(e) (i)  If a person files a claim for a refund of taxes under Subsection
(2)(d)(i) paid on a purchase of tangible personal property or services used in
the construction of or incorporated into a pollution control facility that was
not certified under Section 19-2-125 at the time of the purchase:
(A)  within 180 days after the day on which the board certifies the pollution
control facility, interest shall accrue to the amount of the refund granted by
the State Tax Commission:
(I)  at the rate prescribed in Section 59-1-402; and
(II)  beginning on the day on which the person pays the tax under Title 59,
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, for which the person is claiming a refund;
or
(B)  more than 180 days after the day on which the board certifies the
pollution control facility, interest shall be added to the amount of the
refund granted by the State Tax Commission:
(I)  at the rate prescribed in Section 59-1-402; and
(II)  beginning 30 days after the day on which the person files the claim for
a refund under Subsection (2)(d).
(ii)  If a person files a claim for a refund of taxes under Subsection
(2)(d)(ii) paid on a purchase of tangible personal property or services used
in the construction of or incorporated into a pollution control facility that
was certified under Section 19-2-125 at the time of the purchase, interest
shall accrue to the amount of the refund granted by the State Tax Commission:
(A)  at the rate prescribed in Section 59-1-402; and
(B)  beginning 30 days after the day on which the person files a claim for a
refund under Subsection (2)(d).
(3) (a)  Each application shall:
(i)  be in a format prescribed by the board; and
(ii)  contain:
(A)  a description of the facility and materials incorporated in the facility;
(B)  the machinery and equipment;
(C)  the existing or proposed operational procedure; and
(D)  a statement of the purpose of pollution prevention, control, or reduction
served or to be served by the facility.
(b)  The board may require any further information it finds necessary before
issuance of a certificate.
